Washington statutes.
RCW 39.48.040

Chapter optional.

It shall be optional with any such issuer, at its discretion, to exercise all or any of the powers conferred by this chapter in connection with the adoption and exercise by any such issuer of the provisions and powers granted by existing law.

[ 1933 ex.s. c 30 s 4; RRS s 5583-14.]